Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-7016
Rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Nebraska Biodiesel Tax Credit Act.

Laws 2023, LB727, § 8.